src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/kmr/hyphenation/hyph_kmr.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.ka6r4a1
.ka1
.ka1r
a1
a1l4a1
a1l
6amît.
a1m
amî1
amî1t
4a1n
ar5a6nî1
a1r
a1r4a1
ar4a1n
3a1v
4av2a1y
ava1
2a1y
1b
b4a1
2b1b
2b1l
2b1r
2b1s
2b1x
1c
2c1b
2c2k
2c1l
1ç
2ç1k
1d
da6vêji1
da1
d3a1v
davê1
davê1j
2d1b
dbû6n4a1
dbû1n
2d1d
dda4
2d1g
2d1r
2d1t
d4y2o
d1y
4dyû
e1
ea2
e4d1y
e1d
e1e2
eê2
e4f1r
e1f
el4a1
e1l
erde1s6
e1r
e2r1d
e1rde1
er6desta1
erde2s1t
e4t1r
e1t
2e1z
ê1
ê2a1
êl3a4v
ê1l
êla1
1f
f1l4
f4lî1
4flû
f4r2o
f1r
2f1s
2f1ş
2f1t
2f1x
1g
2g1b
2g1h
2g1k
g2l
2g1n
2g1r
2g1s
2g1t
1h
2h1b
2h1d
2h1k
2h1m
2h1n
2h1r
2h1s
2h1t
i1
i1i2
il4a1
i1l
i4nê1r
i1n
inê1
ire4h
i1r
ire1
i2s
î1
î2a1
2î1d
îe4t
îe1
î2j
î1l3
î4p1l
î1p
îsti6ye1
î1s
î2s1t
îsti1
îsti1y
1j
6ja6va.
ja1
j3a1v
java1
2j1h
2j1k
2j1m
2j1n
2j1t
1k
2k1b
2k1ç
2k1k
2k1l
2k1m
2k1n
2k1r
2k1s
2k1t
2k1v
2k1w
2k1x
2k1y
1l
6la4mîtê1
la1
la1m
lamî1
lamî1t
2l1b
2l1c
2l1ç
2l1d
l4e1
2l1f
2l1g
2l1h
2l1k
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
2l1p
2l1q
2l1s
2l1t
2l1v
2l1w
2l1x
2l1y
2l1z
1m
ma4î1
ma1
2m1b
2m1d
2m1f
4mîtê1
mî1
mî1t
2m1m
2m1p2
2m1r
2m1s
2m1w
2m1y
2m1z
1n
n4a1
2n1b
2n1c
2n1ç
2n1d
nê4re1
nê1
nê1r
2n1f
2n1g
2n1h
2n1k
nki4
2n1n
2n1p
2n1s
2n1ş
2n1t
2n1v
2n1x
2n1y
2n2z
2o
o1f2
o2h
o2s
o2w
1p
2p1s
2p1t
1q
2q1p
2q1ş
1r
r4a1
raî4
2r1b
2r1c
2r1ç
2r1d
2r1f
r4fi4
2r1g
2r1h
2r1j
2r1k
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2r1q
2r1r
2r1s
2r1t
2r1v
2r1w
2r1x
2r1y
2r1z
1s
3sa1
2s1b
3se1
2s1g
3sî1
2s1k
2s1p
2s1r
2s1s
2s1t
s4t3a4v
sta1
st4r
3su1
3sû
2s1y
1ş
4ş3a4v
şa1
2ş1b
2ş1d
şê4l
şê1
2ş1g
2ş1h
2ş1k
2ş1m
2ş1n
2ş1p
2ş1t2
2ş1v
2ş1x
1t
4t3a1v
ta1
2t1g
tge4
2t1k
2t1l
2t1m
2t1n
tnî4
2t1p
t4r4a1
t1r
t4rû
2t3s2
2t1t
2t1x
2t1y
u1
ue2
u2i1
u2k
urandi6
u1r
ur4a1
ur4a1n
ura2n1d
u2ş
1v
2v1b
2v1ç
2v1d
2v1g
2v1h
2v1k
2v1n
2v1r
2v1s
2v1ş
2v1y
1w
2w1c
2w1d
2w1h
2w1k
2w1l
2w1n
2w1r
2w1s
2w1ş
2w1t
1x
x4a1
2x1ç
2x1l
2x1n
2x1t
x4t1r
x2w
1y
2y1b
2y1d
yda4
2y1l
2y1n
2y1r
2y1s
2y1t
2y1v
2y1w
1z
2z1b
2z1d
1z3e4z
ze1
2z1k
2z1m
2z1r
2z1t
2z1y
2z1z
